Mississippi, session 2026, HB682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  (a)  There may be no recovery for the first Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) of bodily injury and no recovery for the first Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) of property damage based on any cause or right of action arising out of a motor vehicle accident, for the injury or damages occasioned by an owner or operator of a motor vehicle involved in the accident who fails to own or maintain a motor vehicle liability policy or other security acceptable as proof of financial responsibility under Section 63-15-37. (b)  For purposes of this section, the meaning of the terms "bodily injury" and "property damage" is governed by the applicable motor vehicle liability insurance policy or, in the event of proof of financial responsibility other than an insurance policy, the meaning that is commonly ascribed to those terms. (c)  (i)  The limitations on recovery prescribed in this subsection do not apply if the driver of the other vehicle: 1.  Is charged with an offense under Section 63-11-30 in connection with the accident and subsequently is convicted of or pleads nolo contendere to the offense; 2.   Intentionally causes the accident; 3.   Flees from the scene of the accident; or 4.  At the time of the accident, is in furtherance of the commission of a felony offense. (ii)  The limitations on recovery prescribed in this subsection do not apply if at the time of the accident, the other vehicle is not being operated. (2)  A person who is involved in an accident in which the other motor vehicle was not covered by a motor vehicle liability policy or other form of security authorized under this chapter and who is found to be liable for damages to the owner or operator of the other motor vehicle may assert as an affirmative defense the limitations on recovery prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. (3)  If the owner or operator of a motor vehicle who fails to own or maintain a motor vehicle liability policy or other form of security authorized under this chapter institutes an action to recover damages in any amount regardless of whether that owner or operator is at fault, and is awarded an amount equal to or less than the minimum amount of motor vehicle liability insurance or other security, then the owner or operator must be assessed and held liable for all court costs incurred by all parties to the action. (4)  A person who applies for a driver's license, registers a motor vehicle, or operates or owns a motor vehicle in this state is deemed to have given his consent to be subject to and governed by this section.  Each person who applies for the issuance or renewal of a driver's license, motor vehicle title, or motor vehicle registration must sign a declaration on a form developed by the Department of Public Safety pursuant to rule and regulation stating that the person acknowledges and gives consent to the requirements and provisions of this section and that the person will comply with this section and the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Safety-Responsibility Law.  However, proof of whether the person obtained or signed this declaration is irrelevant to the application of this section. (5)  This section does not preclude a passenger in a vehicle from asserting a claim to recover damages for injury, death or loss which the passenger occasioned, in whole or in part, by the negligence of another person arising out of the operation or use of a motor vehicle.  This subsection does not apply to a passenger who is also the owner of the uninsured motor vehicle involved in the accident. (6)  (a)  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an insurer does not lose any rights of subrogation for claims paid under the applicable insurance policy for the recovery of any sum in excess of the first Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) of bodily injury and the first Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) of property damages. (b)  In claims where no suit is filed, the claimant's insurer maintains all rights to recover any amount paid by the claimant's insurer on behalf of the insured for the recovery of any sum in excess of the first Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) of bodily injury and the first Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) of property damages. (7)  (a)  Except for a newly acquired vehicle added to a policy subject to the policy terms, the issuance, change or adjustment of a motor vehicle liability insurance policy subsequent to a motor vehicle accident, without proof of coverage having been bound before the motor vehicle accident, does not effectuate any of the following: (i)  The recovery for injury or damages that are otherwise prohibited under this section; (ii)  The defeat of an affirmative defense otherwise allowed under this section; or (iii)  The avoidance of liability for court costs otherwise required under this section. (b)  Reinstatement provisions of a policy during the premium payment grace period specified in the policy may not be deemed invalidated by this section. (8)  This section does not apply to a vehicle that legally is parked at the time of the accident. SECTION 2.  Section 63-15-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-15-3.  The following words and phrases, when used in this chapter, shall, for the purposes of this chapter, have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this section, except in those instances where the context clearly indicates a different meaning: (a) "Highway" means the entire width between property lines of any road, street, way, thoroughfare or bridge in the State of Mississippi not privately owned or controlled, when any part thereof is open to the public for vehicular traffic and over which the state has legislative jurisdiction under its police power. (b) "Judgment" means any judgment which shall have become final by expiration, without appeal, of the time within which an appeal might have been perfected, or by final affirmation on appeal, rendered by a court of competent jurisdiction of any state or of the United States, upon a cause of action arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of any motor vehicle, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use thereof, or upon a cause of action on an agreement of settlement for such damages. (c)  "Motor vehicle" means every self-propelled vehicle (other than traction engines, road rollers and graders, tractor cranes, power shovels, well drillers, implements of husbandry, electric bicycles, personal delivery devices and electric personal assistive mobility devices as defined in Section 63-3-103) which is designed for use upon a highway, including trailers and semitrailers designed for use with such vehicles, and every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires but not operated upon rails. For purposes of this definition, "implements of husbandry" shall not include trucks, pickup trucks, trailers and semitrailers designed for use with such trucks and pickup trucks. (d)  "License" means any driver's, operator's, commercial operator's, or chauffeur's license, temporary instruction permit or temporary license, or restricted license, issued under the laws of the State of Mississippi pertaining to the licensing of persons to operate motor vehicles. (e) "Nonresident" means every person who is not a resident of the State of Mississippi. (f) "Nonresident's operating privilege" means the privilege conferred upon a nonresident by the laws of Mississippi pertaining to the operation by him of a motor vehicle, or the use of a motor vehicle owned by him, in the State of Mississippi. (g) "Operator" means every person who is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle. (h)  "Owner" means a person who holds the legal title of a motor vehicle; in the event a motor vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee or in the event a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then such conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner for the purpose of this chapter. (i)  "Person" means every natural person, firm, copartnership, association or corporation. (j)  "Proof of financial responsibility" means proof of ability to respond in damages for liability, on account of accidents occurring subsequent to the effective date of said proof, arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle, in the amount of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of one (1) person in any one (1) accident, and subject to said limit for one (1) person, in the amount of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons in any one (1) accident, and in the amount of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one (1) accident.  Liability insurance required under this paragraph (j) may contain exclusions and limitations on coverage as long as the exclusions and limitations language or form has been filed with and approved by the Commissioner of Insurance. (k) "Registration" means a certificate or certificates and registration plates issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the registration of motor vehicles. (l) "Department" means the Department of Public Safety of the State of Mississippi, acting directly or through its authorized officers and agents, except in such sections of this chapter in which some other state department is specifically named. (m)  "State" means any state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or any province of the Dominion of Canada. SECTION 3.  Section 63-15-43, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-15-43.  (1)  A "motor vehicle liability policy" as said term is used in this chapter shall mean an owner's or an operator's motor vehicle liability policy, that has been certified as provided in Section 63-15-39 or Section 63-15-41, as proof of financial responsibility, and issued, except as otherwise provided in Section 63-15-41, by an insurance company duly authorized to write motor vehicle liability insurance in this state, to or for the benefit of the person named therein as insured. (2)  Such owner's motor vehicle liability policy: (a)  May be any motor vehicle liability policy form that has been filed with and approved by the Commissioner of Insurance and may contain exclusions and limitations on coverage as long as the exclusions and limitations language has been filed with and approved by the Commissioner of Insurance. (b)  Shall have limits of liability no less than:  Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of one (1) person in any one (1) accident and, subject to said limit for one (1) person, Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons in any one (1) accident, and Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one (1) accident. (3)  Every motor vehicle liability policy certified under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the following provisions which need not be contained therein: (a)  The liability of the insurance company with respect to the insurance required by this chapter shall become absolute whenever injury or damage covered by said motor vehicle liability policy occurs; said policy may not be cancelled or annulled as to such liability by any agreement between the insurance company and the insured after the occurrence of the injury or damage; no statement made by the insured or on his behalf and no violation of said policy shall defeat or void said policy; (b)  The satisfaction by the insured of a judgment for such injury or damage shall not be a condition precedent to the right or duty of the insurance company to make payment on account of such injury or damage; (c)  The insurance company shall have the right to settle any claim covered by the policy, and if such settlement is made in good faith, the amount thereof shall be deductible from the limits of liability specified in paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section; or (d)  The policy, the written application therefor, if any, and any rider or endorsement which does not conflict with the provisions of the chapter shall constitute the entire contract between the parties. (4)  Any policy which grants the coverage required for a motor vehicle liability policy may also grant any lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage specified for a motor vehicle liability policy, and such excess or additional coverage shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter.  With respect to a policy which grants such excess or additional coverage, the term "motor vehicle liability policy" shall apply only to that part of the coverage which is required by this section. (5)  Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide that the insured shall reimburse the insurance company for any payment the insurance company would not have been obligated to make under the terms of the policy except for the provisions of this chapter. (6)  Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide for the prorating of the insurance thereunder with other valid and collectible insurance. (7)  The requirements for a motor vehicle liability policy may be fulfilled by the policies of one or more insurance companies which policies together meet such requirements. (8)  Any binder issued pending the issuance of a motor vehicle liability policy shall be deemed to fulfill the requirements for such a policy. SECTION 4.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified as a new section in Chapter 15, Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.